Vermont, session 2025-2026, H354.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 209(e) is amended to read:
(e) Thermal energy and process fuel efficiency funding.
(1) Each of the following shall be used to deliver thermal energy and
process fuel energy efficiency services in accordance with this section for
unregulated fuels to Vermont consumers of such fuels. In addition, the
Commission may authorize an entity appointed to deliver such services under
subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section to use monies subject to this subsection
for the engineering, design, and construction of facilities for the conversion of
thermal energy customers using fossil fuels to district heat if the majority of
VT LEG #380960 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.354
2025 Page 2 of 4
the district’s energy is from biomass sources, the district’s distribution system
is highly energy efficient, and such conversion is cost effective.
(A) Capacity savings. Net revenues above costs associated with
payments from the New England Independent System Operator (ISO-NE) for
capacity savings resulting from the activities of the energy efficiency utility
designated under subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (e) that are not
transferred to the State PACE Reserve Fund under 24 V.S.A. § 3270(c). These
revenues shall be deposited into the Electric Efficiency Fund established by
this section. In delivering services with respect to heating systems using the
revenues subject to this subdivision (A), the entity shall give priority to
incentives for the installation of high efficiency biomass heating systems and
shall have a goal of offering an incentive that is equal to 25 percent of the
installed cost of such a system. Provision of an incentive under this
subdivision (A) for a biomass heating system shall not be contingent on the
making of other energy efficiency improvements at the property on which the
system will be installed.
(B) RGGI. Net revenues above costs from the sale of carbon credits
under the cap and trade program established under section 255 of this title,
which shall be deposited into the Electric Efficiency Fund established by this
section.
VT LEG #380960 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.354
2025 Page 3 of 4
(C) Other funds. Any other monies that are appropriated to or
deposited in the Electric Efficiency Fund for the delivery of thermal energy
and process fuel energy efficiency services.
(D) Thermal efficiency benefits charge; unregulated fuels. The
Commission may establish by order or rule a volumetric charge to customers
for the support of thermal efficiency programs that are societally cost-effective
to implement and support the greenhouse gas reduction requirements under 10
V.S.A. § 578. The charge shall be known as the thermal efficiency benefits
charge, shall be shown separately on each customer’s bill, and shall be paid to
a fund administrator appointed by the Commission and deposited into the
Electric Efficiency Fund.
(2) If a program combines regulated fuel efficiency services with
unregulated fuel efficiency services supported by funds under this section, the
Commission shall allocate the costs of the program among the funding sources
for the regulated and unregulated fuel sectors in proportion to the benefits
provided to each sector.
(3) In As used in this subsection:
(A) “Biomass” means organic nonfossil material constituting a
source of renewable energy within the meaning of section 8002 of this title.
VT LEG #380960 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.354
2025 Page 4 of 4
(B) “District heat” means a system through which steam or hot water
from a central plant is piped into buildings to be used as a source of thermal
energy.
(C) “Efficiency services” includes the establishment of a statewide
information clearinghouse under subsection (g) of this section.
(D) “Fossil fuel” means an energy source formed in the earth’s crust
from decayed organic material. The common fossil fuels are petroleum, coal,
and natural gas. A fossil fuel may be a regulated or unregulated fuel.
(E) “Regulated fuels” means electricity and natural gas delivered by a
regulated utility.
(F) “Unregulated fuels” means fuels used by thermal energy and
process fuel customers other than electricity and natural gas delivered by a
regulated utility.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380960 v.1